Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.10, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Extended time revenue. (a) A school district's extended time allowance equals $5,117 for fiscal deleted text begin year 2023 and laterdeleted text end new text begin years 2024 and 2025new text end .new text begin A school district's extended time allowance for fiscal year 2026 and later equals the extended time formula allowance for the previous year times the greater of one or the ratio of the basic formula allowance under subdivision 2 for the current year to the basic formula allowance for the previous year.new text end (b) A school district's extended time revenue is equal to the product of the extended time allowance in paragraph (a) and the sum of the adjusted pupil units of the district for each pupil in average daily membership in excess of 1.0 and less than 1.2 according to section 126C.05, subdivision 8. (c) Extended time revenue for pupils placed in an on-site education program at the Prairie Lakes Education Center or the Lake Park School, located within the borders of Independent School District No. 347, Willmar, for instruction provided after the end of the preceding regular school year and before the beginning of the following regular school year equals membership hours divided by the minimum annual instructional hours in section 126C.05, subdivision 15, not to exceed 0.20, times the pupil unit weighting in section 126C.05, subdivision 1, times the extended time allowance in paragraph (a). (d) A school district qualifies for extended time revenue for instruction provided after the end of the preceding regular school year and before the beginning of the following regular school year for (1) every pupil attending a day treatment program, and (2) every pupil placed in a children's residential facility, whether the education services are provided on-site or off-site. Extended time revenue under this paragraph equals total membership hours in summer instruction divided by the minimum annual instructional hours in section 126C.05, subdivision 15, not to exceed 0.20, times the pupil unit weighting in section 126C.05, subdivision 1, times the extended time allowance. (e) For purposes of this subdivision, "children's residential facility" means a residential facility for children, including a psychiatric residential treatment facility, licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Department of Corrections and subject to Minnesota Rules, chapter 2960, or an inpatient hospitalization that includes mental health services. (f) For purposes of this subdivision, "day treatment program" means: (1) a site-based structured mental health program consisting of psychotherapy for three or more individuals and individual or group skills training provided by a team, under the treatment supervision of a mental health professional; or (2) any other day treatment program designated by the commissioner of education consistent with the Minnesota Automated Reporting Student System manual, procedure 27. (g) A school district's extended time revenue may be used for extended day programs, extended week programs, summer school, vacation break academies such as spring break academies and summer term academies, and other programming authorized under the learning year program. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GENERAL EDUCATION AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin General education aid. new text end new text begin For general education aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.13, subdivision 4: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end